src-fst-stems-exceptions.lexc.md
Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

verbs of negation have partial inflection:
€ аволь
€ иля
€ эзь

The verb ярсамс has additional irregular forms:
€ ярстано
€ ярстадо

The verb чуд|емс in orthography but чуде|мс in Сятко

The verb сеземс

Some of the nouns have archaic consonant stem forms left:
€ ийть

Some of the nouns have defective paradigms:
€ кудыкельганть

Periferal

Some random Russian elements:

Some of the nouns have special forms for Gen PxSg1 and PxSg2:

Reciprocal pronouns
These might be done with flags

These two stems have м loss but its presence can be
observed in the choice of "тнэ" over "тне"
This has special hard after lost consonant
This has special hard after lost consonant

1930s Phonetic transcription
дс >> ц
гт >> к
мекевлангт+Adv+Use/NG+Err/Orth:мекевланг K ;  Half way between morphology and phonetics with a Russian twist 

### ADPOSITIONS

### IDEOPHONES
are dealt with as adverbs

### PRONOUNS

### QUANTIFIERS
сисем+Num+Ord:сисеме NUMORD_KUDO ;  This is irregularly formed, cf. сисемце

### NOUNS

### PLACE NAMES
### GEO

### ANIMAL NAMES

### FIRST NAMES

100 % homographs of Russian words

adjectives in _ой_ Adj-od >> A_RU-OJ
with  +Use/SpellNoSugg

+SP+Gen+Indef attributes as adjectives

Russian language words found in Erzya texts

Old Bible Names and words

unrecognized

Problems with synchronization
missing lemmas

COLLECTIVE NOUNS

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc)</small>

---
